Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2310
Fraudulent practices; penalty.

Anyone who fraudulently fails to disclose material assets or income for the purpose of invoking the privileges of sections 25-2301 to 25-2310 is guilty of perjury and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as provided in section 28-915.

Laws 1972, LB 1120, § 10;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 689, § 12.